Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0814.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, (3), a public officer shall file an annual a financial disclosure report with the department by not later than May 15 of each year. Beginning after May 15, 2027, a public officer shall file a financial disclosure report with the department by not later than April 15 of each year. This subsection does not apply to an individual who was a public officer only on the first day of the calendar year. (2) If a public officer who is required to file a report under this act receives notice from the secretary of state under section 13(1)(h), the public officer shall, not later than 9 business days after receiving the notice, file corrections to the errors or omissions or file the report, as applicable. (3) A public officer shall file the financial disclosure report for the reporting period of January 1, 2024 to December 31, 2024 not later than June 13, 2025.